dist/turkspell-v0.6-dd/tr.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekilerce [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekileri [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekilerini [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekilerine [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekilerinde [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekilerinden [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekileriyle [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekilerinin [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekini [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekine [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekinde [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekinden [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekinin [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekiyle [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekiyse [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekidir [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekiydi [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekiymiş [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ 0 sü'ndekiyken [AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊦ k ğü'nde/≩ k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndeki k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekiler k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekilerin k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekilere k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekilerde k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekilerden k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekilerle k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekilerce k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekileri k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekilerini k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekilerine k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekilerinde k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekilerinden k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekileriyle k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekilerinin k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekini k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekine k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekinde k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekinden k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekinin k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekiyle k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekiyse k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekidir k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekiydi k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekiymiş k
SFX ⊦ k ğü'ndekiyken k

SFX ⊧ Y 153
SFX ⊧ 0 'dü .
SFX ⊧ 0 'düm .
SFX ⊧ 0 'dün .
SFX ⊧ 0 'dük .
SFX ⊧ 0 'dünüz .
SFX ⊧ 0 'düler .
SFX ⊧ 0 'tü .
SFX ⊧ 0 'tüm .
SFX ⊧ 0 'tün .
SFX ⊧ 0 'tük .
SFX ⊧ 0 'tünüz .
SFX ⊧ 0 'tüler .
SFX ⊧ 0 'müş .
SFX ⊧ 0 'müşüm .
SFX ⊧ 0 'müşsün .
SFX ⊧ 0 'müşüz .
SFX ⊧ 0 'müşsünüz .
SFX ⊧ 0 'müşler .
SFX ⊧ 0 'se .
SFX ⊧ 0 'sem .
SFX ⊧ 0 'sen .
SFX ⊧ 0 'sek .
SFX ⊧ 0 'seniz .
SFX ⊧ 0 'seler .
SFX ⊧ 0 'üm .
SFX ⊧ 0 'sün .
SFX ⊧ 0 'üz .
SFX ⊧ 0 'sünüz .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ler .
SFX ⊧ 0 'dür .
SFX ⊧ 0 'tür .
SFX ⊧ 0 'dürler .
SFX ⊧ 0 'türler .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerdir .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ken .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ümdür .
SFX ⊧ 0 'sündür .
SFX ⊧ 0 'üzdür .
SFX ⊧ 0 'sünüzdür .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ümün .
SFX ⊧ 0 'üme .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ümü .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ümde .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ümden .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ümle .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ün .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ünün .
SFX ⊧ 0 'üne .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ünü .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ünde .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ünden .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ünle .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ümüz .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ümüzün .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ümüze .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ümüzü .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ümüzde .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ümüzden .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ümüzle .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ünüz .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ünüzün .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ünüze .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ünüzü .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ünüzde .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ünüzden .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ünüzle .
SFX ⊧ 0 'leri .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerini .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerine .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerinde .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerinden .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerinin .
SFX ⊧ 0 'leriyle .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerin .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lere .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerde .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerden .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerle .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerdeki .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerdekiler .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerdekilerden .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerdekileri .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerindeki .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lerindekiler .
SFX ⊧ 0 'm .
SFX ⊧ 0 'mün .
SFX ⊧ 0 'me .
SFX ⊧ 0 'mü .
SFX ⊧ 0 'mde .
SFX ⊧ 0 'mden .
SFX ⊧ 0 'mle .
SFX ⊧ 0 'n .
SFX ⊧ 0 'nün .
SFX ⊧ 0 'ne .
SFX ⊧ 0 'nü .
SFX ⊧ 0 'nde .
SFX ⊧ 0 'nden .
SFX ⊧ 0 'nle .
SFX ⊧ 0 'müz .
SFX ⊧ 0 'müzün .
SFX ⊧ 0 'müze .
SFX ⊧ 0 'müzü .
SFX ⊧ 0 'müzde .
SFX ⊧ 0 'müzden .
SFX ⊧ 0 'müzle .
SFX ⊧ 0 'nüz .
SFX ⊧ 0 'nüzün .
SFX ⊧ 0 'nüze .
SFX ⊧ 0 'nüzü .
SFX ⊧ 0 'nüzde .
SFX ⊧ 0 'nüzden .
SFX ⊧ 0 'nüzle .
SFX ⊧ 0 spor .
SFX ⊧ 0 spor'un .
SFX ⊧ 0 spor'a .
SFX ⊧ 0 spor'da .
SFX ⊧ 0 spor'dan .
SFX ⊧ 0 spor'u .
SFX ⊧ 0 spor'la .
SFX ⊧ 0 spor'lu .
SFX ⊧ 0 spor'lular .
SFX ⊧ 0 spor'lunun .
SFX ⊧ 0 spor'luların .
SFX ⊧ 0 spor'lulara .
SFX ⊧ 0 spor'lularda .
SFX ⊧ 0 spor'lulardan .
SFX ⊧ 0 oğlu [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊧ 0 oğlu'nun [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊧ 0 oğlu'na [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊧ 0 oğlu'nda [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊧ 0 oğlu'ndan [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊧ 0 oğlu'nu [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊧ 0 oğlu'yla [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊧ 0 oğulları [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊧ 0 oğullarının [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊧ 0 oğullarına [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊧ 0 oğullarında [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊧ 0 oğullarından [^AEIOUaeiouÂÎÖÛÜâîöûüİı]
SFX ⊧ 0 leri'nin .
SFX ⊧ 0 leri'ne .
SFX ⊧ 0 leri'nde .
SFX ⊧ 0 leri'nden .
SFX ⊧ 0 leri'ni .
SFX ⊧ 0 leri'yle .
SFX ⊧ 0 leri'ndeki .
SFX ⊧ 0 leri'ndekiler .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lük .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lükler .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lüğü .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lüğün .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lüğe .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lükte .
SFX ⊧ 0 'lükten .

SFX ⊨ Y 6
SFX ⊨ 0 li/≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [aâı]
SFX ⊨ 0 li/≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [aıâ][^aeıioöuüâîû]
SFX ⊨ 0 li/≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [aıâ][^aeıioöuüâîû][^aeıioöuüâîû]
SFX ⊨ 0 lü/≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [ouû]
SFX ⊨ 0 lü/≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [ouû][^aeıioöuüâîû]
SFX ⊨ 0 lü/≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [ouû][^aeıioöuüâîû][^aeıioöuüâîû]

SFX ⊩ Y 6
SFX ⊩ 0 siz/∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [aâı]
SFX ⊩ 0 siz/∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [aıâ][^aeıioöuüâîû]
SFX ⊩ 0 siz/∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [aıâ][^aeıioöuüâîû][^aeıioöuüâîû]
SFX ⊩ 0 süz/∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [ouû]
SFX ⊩ 0 süz/∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [ouû][^aeıioöuüâîû]
SFX ⊩ 0 süz/∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [ouû][^aeıioöuüâîû][^aeıioöuüâîû]

SFX ⊪ Y 12
SFX ⊪ 0 lik/∨≌∢≊∻≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [aâı]
SFX ⊪ 0 lik/∨≌∢≊∻≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [aıâ][^aeıioöuüâîû]
SFX ⊪ 0 lik/∨≌∢≊∻≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [aıâ][^aeıioöuüâîû][^aeıioöuüâîû]
SFX ⊪ 0 liğ/∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆≽XX [aâı]
SFX ⊪ 0 liğ/∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆≽XX [aıâ][^aeıioöuüâîû]
SFX ⊪ 0 liğ/∂≤∭≄∴∸∿≆≽XX [aıâ][^aeıioöuüâîû][^aeıioöuüâîû]
SFX ⊪ 0 lük/∨≌∢≊∻≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [ouû]
SFX ⊪ 0 lük/∨≌∢≊∻≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [ouû][^aeıioöuüâîû]
SFX ⊪ 0 lük/∨≌∢≊∻≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [ouû][^aeıioöuüâîû][^aeıioöuüâîû]
SFX ⊪ 0 lüğ/∃≤∮≅∵∹≀≈≽XX [ouû]
SFX ⊪ 0 lüğ/∃≤∮≅∵∹≀≈≽XX [ouû][^aeıioöuüâîû]
SFX ⊪ 0 lüğ/∃≤∮≅∵∹≀≈≽XX [ouû][^aeıioöuüâîû][^aeıioöuüâîû]

SFX ⊫ Y 10
SFX ⊫ 0 ci/≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [aâı]
SFX ⊫ 0 ci/≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [aıâ][^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ⊫ 0 ci/≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [aıâ][^aeıioöuüâîû][^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ⊫ 0 cü/≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [ouû]
SFX ⊫ 0 cü/≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [ouû][^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ⊫ 0 cü/≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [ouû][^aeıioöuüâîû][^çfhkpsşt]
SFX ⊫ 0 çi/≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [aıâ][çfhkpsşt]
SFX ⊫ 0 çi/≧⊇∨≌≮≫≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [aıâ][^aeıioöuüâîû][çfhkpsşt]
SFX ⊫ 0 çü/≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [ouû][çfhkpsşt]
SFX ⊫ 0 çü/≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪≎∌∍≍∗∘∖ [ouû][^aeıioöuüâîû][çfhkpsşt]
