dist/turkspell-v0.6-dd/tr.dic
alp/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩L∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
amfibol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨LL∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
amiral/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
ampul/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
anketörlük/≒∨≌∢≊∻≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
anormal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪LL∍
aval/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩L∍∖⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
bakarkörlük/≒∨≌∢≊∻≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
bandrol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩L∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
başrol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩L∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
beytülmal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩KL⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
biat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
bidat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩K⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
biyokatalizör/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
bol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪L⊫∍≍∗∘∖⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
bölütlü/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
bütünlüklü/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
celal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪L⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
cemaat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
cemal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
cerahat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
dansörlük/≒∨≌∢≊∻≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
dijital/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍∗∘∖⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
dikkat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
dublör/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪≎∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
düdük/≒∨≌∢≊∻≩∩∪≎∌∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
düşkü/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
eflak/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨L⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
ekol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩L∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
emsal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
ense kökü/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
faul/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
feragat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
fesahat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨L⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
festival/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
final/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩L∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
FMVİÜ/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
folklor/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨L⊫∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
ful/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨L⊫∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
gayrimenkul/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪L⊫∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
gazal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨L⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
gol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍∖⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
golcü/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∪≎∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
görgülü/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
gözlükçü/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∪∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
gümgüm/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∌∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
güçsüz/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪∍∘⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
had/∟∨≌∢≊∻≩⊨⊩L∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
hakikat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
hal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍∗∖⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
harf/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
harp/≑∨≌∢≊∻≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
hayal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
hilal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
hol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪LL∍∖⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
hâd/∟∨≌∢≊∻≩K⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
höt zöt/≒∨≌∢≊∻≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
ideal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
idol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩L∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
idrak/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩L∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
ihlal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
ihmal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
ihtifal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩KL⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
ikbal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨L⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
ikmal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
ilmihal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩K⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
integral/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
intikal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
iptal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
isal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨LL∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
istikbal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
istiklal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
istirahat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
itaat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
iyodür/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
işgal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
işkâl/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
iştirak/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨L⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
jul/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪LL∍∖⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
jurnal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩KL⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
kabahat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
kalp/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
kalp/≑∨≌∢≊∻≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
kanaat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
kançöküm/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
Kemal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝⊞⊟
kemal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍
klorölçüm/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
kontrol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍≇⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
koral/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨LL∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
korgeneral/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪LL∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
KTMÜ/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
köprücük/≒∨≌∢≊∻≩∍≍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
küllük/≒∨≌∢≊∻≩∩∌∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
küşüm/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
kıraat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
lal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪LL∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
liberal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩KL⊫∍∗∘∖
lokal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪LL∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
mahal/∟∨≌∢≊∻≩⊨⊩L∍∖⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
mahsul/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩L∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
malmüdürlüğü/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
mamul/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪L⊫∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
marjinal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩KL⊫∍∗∖⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
materyal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
melal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪LL∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
menfaat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
metropol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩L∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
meçhul/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪L⊫∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
mineral/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩L∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
minör/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∪∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
mol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪L⊫∍∖⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
monopol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪L⊫∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
moral/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩L∍≍∖⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
müzikal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
nasihat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
Niinistö/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
nükûl/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨LL∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
orijinal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪LL∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
oryantal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪LL∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
paldır küldür/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
petrol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
potasyum sülfür/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
profiterol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨L⊫∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
pırdöndü/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
radikal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪L⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
refakat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
resital/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪LL∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
rikkat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
rol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩⊫∍∖⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
saat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍≍∖≇⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
sadakat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
sansürsüz/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∪∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
santral/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
sarahat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨LL∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
seyahat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
sinyal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
sosyal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪L⊫∍∗∘∖⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
spiral/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
sterol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨LL∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
sual/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
suistimal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
sökü/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∩∌∍∖⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
sülükçülük/≒∨≌∢≊∻≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
sürat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍∖⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
süslü püslü/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
sıhhat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
tamgün/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∪∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
tekeffül/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
tesettürlü/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
trol/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍∖⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
tul/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨L⊫∍⊐⊑⊒⊓⊔⊕⊖⊗
tuval/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
TÇÜD/√∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
valf/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩L∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
vebal/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
vüsat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨LL∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
yarı ünlü/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
zanaat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩K⊩⊫∍≍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
zeval/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
çobanüzümü/∋∃≤∨≌∮∢≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
ölümlük/≒∨≌∢≊∻≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
özlük/≒∨≌∢≊∻≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
üzüntülü/∜≨⊇∨≌≯≫≊∻≅∵∹≀≈≩∍⊠⊡⊢⊣⊤⊥⊦⊧
şefaat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩⊫∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
şefkat/∙∂≤∨≌∭∢≊∻≄∴∸∿≆≩⊨⊪⊩L∍⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
